Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.140

Signals district may utilize.

A district may translate or retransmit only those signals which originate from commercial and educational FM radio stations and commercial and educational television stations which directly provide, within some portion of the state of Washington, a class A grade or class B grade contour, as such classes are defined under regulations of the Federal Communications Commission as of August 9, 1971.

[ 1985 c 76 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 14.]